Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-562
System; purposes.

The purpose of the system is to allow for the efficient operation of state government and its political subdivisions. In managing and allocating resources on the system, the officer shall assign first priority to providing capacity for statewide applications that are essential to carrying out the duties of state agencies in an efficient and effective manner. The system may also serve local data processing needs of political subdivisions, provide citizens with a point of access to governmental services and information, and serve other state and local needs, subject to available resources.

Laws 1993, LB 543, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 33;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1120.37;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 332;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 13.
July 18, 2008